Vermont, session 2025-2026, H832.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 7 V.S.A. § 224 is amended to read:
§ 224. FOURTH-CLASS LICENSES
* * *
(c)(1) At only one not more than 10 fourth-class license location locations,
a licensed manufacturer or rectifier may sell by the unopened container or
VT LEG #386558 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.832
2026 Page 2 of 2
distribute by the glass, with or without charge, alcoholic beverages produced
by no not more than five additional manufacturers or rectifiers, provided these
beverages are purchased on invoice from the manufacturer or rectifier.
(2) A manufacturer or rectifier may sell its product to no more than five
additional any Vermont manufacturers or rectifiers.
* * *
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 255 is amended to read:
§ 255. RETAIL ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE TASTING PERMITS
(a) The Division of Liquor Control may grant a licensee a permit to
conduct an alcoholic beverage tasting event as provided in subsection (b) of
this section if:
(1) the licensee has submitted a written application in a form required by
the Commissioner and paid the fee provided in section 204 of this title at least
five days one day prior to the date of the alcoholic beverage tasting event; and
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386558 v.1